Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5538.
people of the state of michigan enact: Enacting section 1. The transmission infrastructure planning act, 2021 PA 125, MCL 460.591 to 460.593, is repealed. Enacting section 2. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02280'25) or House Bill No. 5540 (request no. H02280'25). (b) House Bill No. 5539 (request no. H02281'25).